Maine, session 132, LD1006.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §2711 is enacted to read:
§2711. Drug testing of pregnant persons and persons who have given birth
A health care provider may perform a blood test on a pregnant person with the person's
consent directly before childbirth to determine the presence of any drug or medication prior
to administering any drug or medication to the person. The health care provider shall
maintain a record of any drug or medication administered to the pregnant person during
childbirth. The health care provider may perform a blood test on the person who gave birth
with the person's consent to determine the presence of any drug or medication subsequent
to childbirth. The results of all blood tests under this section must be reconciled prior to a
report of drug use being made. If a report of drug use under this section is made, all records
required to be maintained under this section and the results of all blood tests taken under
this section must accompany the report. As used in this section, "health care provider" has
the same meaning as in Title 4, section 1201, subsection 10-A.